Wyoming statutes. Title 42 Welfare
Article 5. Energy Assistance

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, ch. 81, § 4, provides:

“(a)

The department of family services shall include a request for funds in its 2009-2010 standard budget request to continue funding for the low income home energy assistance program at levels provided under this act.

“(b)

The department of family services shall modify any existing state plan submitted pursuant to P.L. 97-35 as necessary to reflect the provisions of this act. A modified state plan may be submitted to federal authorities immediately and shall be submitted no later than July 30, 2006.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 81, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

§ 42-2-501.
Low income home energy assistance and weatherization program; funding.

The department shall administer a low income home energy assistance program in accordance with federal P.L. 97-35, as amended. The department shall submit and keep current a state plan and shall administer the program in accordance with the state plan and this section.

The program shall provide energy assistance to eligible households as provided in this section. Energy assistance shall include those uses of federal funds authorized under P.L. 97-35, as amended. To the extent permitted by federal law the state plan shall provide that of the authorized uses not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the available funding for the program shall be used for weatherization assistance. Weatherization assistance shall include the following for residential dwellings only:

Weatherization needs assessments and audits;

Caulking, insulation, storm window and similar improvements to reduce energy use;

Furnace and heating system modifications and repairs;

Furnace replacement;

Repealed by Laws 2013 ch. 183, § 1.

Repair or replacement of water heaters and heating systems for portions of a dwelling;

Other measures as determined by the department to be necessary to ensure a safe, well-weatherized dwelling.

In addition to categorically eligible individuals authorized under P.L. 97-35, as amended, the state plan shall provide eligibility for those households with incomes which do not exceed the lesser of:

An amount equal to two hundred fifteen percent (215%) of the federal poverty level for Wyoming; or

An amount equal to sixty percent (60%) of the state median household income.

The department may modify the state plan as necessary:

To meet federal requirements not to exclude households with lesser incomes than the amounts specified in subsection (c) of this section; and

To exclude households from receiving federal funds if the household income limitation provided in this section would violate federal restrictions.

The maximum assistance provided to any household under the program in any state fiscal year shall not exceed the federal department of energy maximum annual unit average as calculated and authorized under P.L. 106-469, as amended.

The department may adopt rules and regulations as necessary to implement this section.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 81, § 1; 2013 ch. 183, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, repealed former (b)(v), which read: “Cooling efficiency modifications, repairs and replacements.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017,
in (c), substituted “lesser” for “greater”;
in (c)(ii), added “household.”